Montana, session 2025, HB771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Off-campus residence -- living with family member. (1) A university or
college facility may not require a student to live in an on-campus housing facility as a condition of enrollment or
attendance at any unit of the Montana university system if the student lives with an immediate family member at
the family member's principal residence that, driving at a reasonable speed for the road surface, is within a 1-
hour drive of the campus where the student attends university or college.
(2) The university or college may require the student to submit a form attesting to the student's
residence with the immediate family member and may require the student to sign an acknowledgement that
providing false information regarding the student's residence may result in disciplinary action by the university
or college.
(3) When a student submits a form for approval of off-campus housing pursuant this section, the
university or college shall approve or deny the student's request within 2 business days. The university or
college may not deny the student's request if the student meets the requirements of this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "immediate family member" means a parent or legal guardian,
a grandparent, an aunt or uncle, or a sibling who is 18 years of age or older.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 25, part 5, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 25, part 5, apply to [section 1].
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 771

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 771.1

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 771